third_party/liblouis/src/tables/da-dk-g28.ctb
# liblouis: Danish, grade 2 table for 8 dots
#
# April 21, 1997: Danske Punktskriftnævn - 1993
# Danish table (with the danish braille authorityæs 1993 braille code changes)

# January 2013 , Bue Vester-Andersen: All tables completely restructured and revised. 
# partly modeled after German table structure with the addition of hyphenation file.
# This is still an experimental test version and should be considered to be under development.

include da-dk-g18.utb
include da-dk-g2core.cti

# letsign - only used in 8-dots in grade 2
letsign 6
noletsign Ii

# special rules for q w x and z and accented letters
always q 6-12345
always w 6-2456
always x 6-1346
always z 6-1356
always à 6-12356
always \x00e7 6-12346 # c cedilla
always é 6-123456
always è 6-2346
always ê 6-126
always ë 6-1246
always î 6-146
always ï 6-12456
always ô 6-1456
always ù 6-23456
always û 6-156
always ü 6-1256
# cap version (not generated automatically)
always Q 6-123457
always W 6-24567
always x 6-13467
always z 6-13567
always À 6-123567
always \x00c7 6-123467 # c cedilla
always É 6-1234567
always È 6-23467
always Ê 6-1267
always Ë 6-12467
always Î 6-1467
always Ï 6-124567
always Ô 6-14567
always Ù 6-234567
always Û 6-1567
always Ü 6-12567

# automatically generated rules for contractions with cap first letter.
include da-dk-g28caps.cti
include hyph_da_DK.dic
